Utah statutes.
32A-12-504.   Unlawful transportation.
It is unlawful for any person, including a motor carrier, or any officer,
agent, or employee of a motor carrier, to order or purchase any alcoholic
product or to cause any alcoholic product to be shipped, carried, or
transported into this state, or from one place to another within this state
except as otherwise authorized by this title.
